District of Columbia statutes.
8-2013

Rules.

(a)

Within 120 days of March 7, 1991, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall establish travel routes for and boundaries of the operation of the horse-drawn carriage trade.

(c)

The proposed rules shall establish an appropriate level of liability insurance coverage for the owner or operator of a horse-drawn carriage trade.

(d)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 14, 38 DCR 207
1981 Ed., § 6-1043.